Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-905
Judgment; effect.

The judgment shall be with costs, may be enforced, and shall be subject to reversal, in the same manner as if it had been rendered in an action, unless otherwise provided in the submission.

R.S.1867, Code § 569, p. 494;

R.S.1913, § 7721;

C.S.1922, § 8665;

C.S.1929, § 20-905;

R.S.1943, § 25-905.